Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act and ORS  192.672 are added to and made a part of
ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
SECTION 2. Any person may submit to the Oregon Government Ethics Commission:
(1) A written request  for the commission to issue and publish a commission advisory
opinion under ORS 244.280 on the application of ORS 192.610 to 192.705 to any  actual or hy-
pothetical circumstance;
(2) A written request for the executive director  of the Oregon Government Ethics Com-
mission to issue and publish a staff  advisory opinion under ORS 244.282 on the application
of ORS 192.610 to 192.705 to any actual or hypothetical circumstance; or
(3) A  written or oral request for the executive director or other staff of the commission
to issue  written or oral staff advice under ORS 244.284 on the application of ORS 192.610 to
192.705 to any actual or hypothetical circumstance.
SECTION 3.  ORS 244.280 is amended to read:
244.280. (1) Upon the written request of any  person, or upon its own motion, the Oregon Gov-
ernment Ethics Commission, under signature  of the chairperson, may issue and publish written
commission advisory opinions on the application  of ORS [ 192.660] 192.610 to 192.705  or any pro-
vision of this chapter to any proposed transaction or action or  any actual or hypothetical circum-
stance. A commission advisory opinion, and a  decision by the commission to issue an advisory
opinion on its own motion, must be approved by a majority of the members  of the commission. Legal
counsel to the commission shall  review a proposed commission advisory opinion before the opinion
is considered by the commission.
(2) Not  later than 60 days after the date the commission receives the written request for a
commission advisory opinion, the commission shall issue either the opinion or  a written denial of
the request. The  written denial shall explain the reasons for the denial. The commission may ask
the person requesting the advisory opinion to  supply additional information the commission consid-
ers necessary to render the opinion. The  commission, by vote of a majority of the members of the
commission, may extend the 60-day deadline by one period not to exceed 60 days.
(3) Except as  provided in this subsection, unless the commission advisory opinion is revised or
revoked, the commission may not impose a penalty under ORS 244.350 or 244.360 on a person for
any good faith action the person takes in reliance on  an advisory opinion issued under this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 1
The commission may impose a penalty under ORS 244.350 or 244.360 on  the person who requested
the advisory opinion if the commission determines  that the person omitted or misstated material
facts in making the request.
SECTION 4.  ORS 244.282 is amended to read:
244.282. (1) Upon the written request of any person, the executive director of  the Oregon Gov-
ernment Ethics Commission may issue and publish written staff advisory opinions on  the application
of ORS [ 192.660] 192.610 to 192.705 or any provision of this chapter to any proposed  transaction or
action or any actual or hypothetical circumstance.
(2) Not later than 30 days after the date the executive  director receives the written request for
a staff advisory opinion, the executive director shall issue either the opinion or  a written denial of
the request. The written denial shall explain the reasons  for the denial. The executive director may
ask the person requesting the advisory opinion to supply additional information the  executive di-
rector considers necessary to render the opinion. The executive  director may extend the 30-day
deadline by one period not to exceed 30 days. The executive director shall clearly  designate an
opinion issued under this section as a staff advisory opinion.
(3)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, unless the staff advisory opinion
is revised or revoked, the commission may only issue a written letter  of reprimand, explanation or
education for any good faith action  a person takes in reliance on a staff advisory opinion issued
under this section.
(b) The commission may impose, for an action that is subject to a  penalty and that is taken in
reliance on a staff advisory opinion issued under this section, a penalty  under ORS 244.350 or
244.360 on the person  who requested the opinion if the commission determines that the person
omitted or misstated material facts in making the request.
(4) At each regular meeting of the commission, the executive director shall report  to the com-
mission on all staff advisory opinions issued since the last regular meeting of the commission. The
commission on its own motion may issue a commission advisory opinion under ORS 244.280  on the
same facts or circumstances that form the basis for any staff advisory opinion.
SECTION 5.  ORS 244.284 is amended to read:
244.284. (1) Upon the written or oral request of any person, the executive director or other staff
of the Oregon Government Ethics Commission may issue written  or oral staff advice on the appli-
cation of ORS [ 192.660] 192.610 to  192.705 or any provision of this chapter to any proposed trans-
action or action  or any actual or hypothetical circumstance. Any written advice not designated as
a staff advisory opinion under ORS 244.282 is considered staff advice issued under this section.
(2) Before imposing any penalty under ORS  244.350 or 244.360, the commission may consider
whether the action that may  be subject to penalty was taken in reliance on staff advice issued under
this section.
SECTION 6.  ORS 192.660 is amended to read:
192.660. (1)  ORS 192.610 to 192.705 do not prevent the governing body of a public body from
holding executive  session during a regular, special or emergency meeting, after the presiding officer
has identified the authorization under ORS 192.610 to 192.705 for holding the executive session.
(2) The governing body of a public body may hold an executive session:
(a) To consider the employment of a public officer, employee, staff member or individual agent.
(b) To consider the dismissal or disciplining of, or to  hear complaints or charges brought
against, a public officer,  employee, staff member or individual agent who does not request an open
hearing.
(c) To consider matters pertaining to the function of  the medical staff of a public hospital li-
censed pursuant to ORS 441.015  to 441.119 and 441.993 including, but not limited to, all clinical
committees, executive, credentials, utilization review, peer review committees and all other  matters
relating to medical competency in the hospital.
(d) To conduct deliberations with persons designated by the governing  body to carry on labor
negotiations.
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 2
(e) To conduct deliberations with persons designated  by the governing body to negotiate real
property transactions.
(f) To consider information or records that are exempt by law from public inspection.
(g) To consider preliminary negotiations involving matters of trade or commerce in  which the
governing body is in competition with governing bodies in other states or nations.
(h) To consult with counsel concerning the legal rights and duties of a public body  with regard
to current litigation or litigation likely to be filed.
(i) To review and evaluate the employment-related performance of the chief executive officer of
any public body, a public officer, employee or staff member who does not request an open hearing.
(j) To carry  on negotiations under ORS chapter 293 with private persons or businesses regarding
proposed acquisition, exchange or liquidation of public investments.
(k) To consider matters relating to school safety or a  plan that responds to safety threats made
toward a school.
(L) If the governing body is a health  professional regulatory board, to consider information ob-
tained as part of an investigation of licensee or applicant conduct.
(m) If  the governing body is the State Landscape Architect Board, or an advisory committee to
the board,  to consider information obtained as part of an investigation of registrant or applicant
conduct.
(n) To discuss information about review or approval of programs relating  to the security of any
of the following:
(A) A nuclear-powered thermal power plant or nuclear installation.
(B) Transportation of radioactive material derived from  or destined for a nuclear-fueled thermal
power plant or nuclear installation.
(C) Generation, storage or conveyance of:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Gas in liquefied or gaseous form;
(iii) Hazardous substances as defined in ORS 453.005 (7)(a), (b) and (d);
(iv) Petroleum products;
(v) Sewage; or
(vi) Water.
(D) Telecommunication systems, including cellular, wireless or radio systems.
(E) Data transmissions by whatever means provided.
(o) To consider matters relating to the safety of the governing body and of public body  staff and
volunteers and the security of public body facilities and meeting spaces.
(p) To consider matters relating to cyber security infrastructure  and responses to cyber security
threats.
(3) Labor negotiations shall be conducted in open meetings  unless negotiators for both sides
request that negotiations  be conducted in executive session. Labor negotiations conducted in exec-
utive session are not subject to the notification requirements of ORS 192.640.
(4) Representatives of the news media shall be allowed to  attend executive sessions other than
those held under subsection (2)(d) of this section relating to labor negotiations or executive  session
held pursuant to ORS 332.061 (2) but the governing  body may require that specified information be
undisclosed.
(5) When a governing  body convenes an executive session under subsection (2)(h) of this section
relating to conferring with counsel  on current litigation or litigation likely to be filed, the governing
body shall bar any member of the  news media from attending the executive session if the member
of the news media is a party  to the litigation or is an employee, agent or contractor of a news media
organization that is a party to the litigation.
(6) No executive session may be  held for the purpose of taking any final action or making any
final decision.
(7) The exception granted by subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The filling of a vacancy in an elective office.
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 3
(b) The filling of a vacancy on any public committee, commission or other advisory group.
(c) The consideration of general employment policies.
(d) The employment of the chief executive officer, other  public officers, employees and staff
members of a public body unless:
(A) The public body has advertised the vacancy;
(B) The public body has adopted regular hiring procedures;
(C) In the case of an officer, the public has  had the opportunity to comment on the employment
of the officer; and
(D) In the case of a chief executive officer, the governing body has  adopted hiring standards,
criteria and policy directives in meetings open to the public in  which the public has had the op-
portunity to comment on the standards, criteria and policy directives.
(8) A governing body may not use an executive session for purposes of evaluating a  chief exec-
utive officer or other officer,  employee or staff member to conduct a general evaluation of an agency
goal, objective or operation or any directive to personnel concerning  agency goals, objectives, op-
erations or programs.
(9) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (6) of this section and ORS 192.650:
(a) ORS 676.175 governs the public disclosure of  minutes, transcripts or recordings relating to
the substance and disposition of licensee or applicant conduct investigated by a health professional
regulatory board.
(b) ORS 671.338 governs the public disclosure  of minutes, transcripts or recordings relating to
the substance and disposition of registrant or  applicant conduct investigated by the State Landscape
Architect Board or an advisory committee to the board.
[(10) Any person may submit to the Oregon Government Ethics Commission: ]
[(a) A written request for the commission to issue and publish  a commission advisory opinion un-
der ORS 244.280 on the application of this section to any actual or hypothetical circumstance; ]
[(b) A written request for the executive director  of the Oregon Government Ethics Commission to
issue and publish a staff advisory opinion under  ORS 244.282 on the application of this section to any
actual or hypothetical circumstance; or ]
[(c) A  written or oral request for the executive director or other staff of the commission to issue
written or oral staff advice under ORS 244.284 on the application of this section  to any actual or hy-
pothetical circumstance. ]
[(11)] (10)  Notwithstanding ORS 244.290, the Oregon Government Ethics Commission may not
adopt rules that establish what  entities are considered representatives of the news media that are
entitled to attend executive sessions under subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 7.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 4
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 5